Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1670.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 122A.06, subdivision 6, is amended to read: Subd. 6. Shortage area. "Shortage area" means: (1) licensure fields and economic development regions reported by the Professional Educator Licensing and Standards Board as experiencing a teacher shortagenew text begin including the number of assignments a school district is unable to fill with a licensed teacher by November 1 of every even-numbered yearnew text end ; and (2) economic development regions where the aggregate percentage of Indigenous teachers and teachers of color in the region is lower than the aggregate percentage of kindergarten through grade 12 Indigenous students and students of color in that region. Only individuals who close the gap between these percentages qualify as filling a shortage by this definition. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2025. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 122A.091, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. Supply and demand report. The Professional Educator Licensing and Standards Board must submit a report to the education committees of the legislature by November 1, 2025, and November 1 of each even-numbered year thereafter, on the supply and demand of teachers. The report must be made available on the board's website. The report must include data regarding: (1) retirement patterns; (2) teacher licensure; (3) teacher diversity, including whether the state's teacher workforce reflects the diversity of the state's student population; (4) the teacher shortage, and the substitute teacher shortage, including patterns and shortages in licensure field areas and the economic development regions of the state; (5) survey data from school districts and teacher preparation programs; and (6) whether districts are making progress in hiring teachers and substitute teachers in the areas of shortagenew text begin , including the number of teachers hired in the preceding two years, the number of teachers hired holding a license at each tier level, the number of assignments the school district was unable to fill with a licensed teacher, and permissions for license fields without a board-approved preparation program by economic development regionsnew text end . new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2025. new text end Sec. 3. new text begin TEACHER SUPPLY AND DEMAND REPORT.new text end new text begin (a) The Professional Educator Licensing and Standards Board must include in the report required under Minnesota Statutes, section 122A.091, subdivision 5, by February 1, 2026, the number of teacher openings, by school district, for teachers with licenses in the following fields: new text end new text begin (1) English as a second language; new text end new text begin (2) early childhood; new text end new text begin (3) special education; new text end new text begin (4) career and technical education; new text end new text begin (5) science, technology, engineering, arts, and math; and new text end new text begin (6) world languages. new text end new text begin (b) For each field listed in paragraph (a), the report must also include the number of teachers hired, by school district, at each license tier level, and the number of teacher assignments the school district was unable to fill with a licensed teacher. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end